Utah statutes.
35A-3-115.   Public Employment Offices -- Agreements with other authorities -- Federal system accepted -- Appropriation.

(1) (a)  The division shall establish and maintain free public employment offices in a manner and in places as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and for the purposes of performing the functions as are within the purview of the Act of Congress entitled "An act to provide for the establishment of a national employment system and for co-operation with the states in the promotion of such system, and for other purposes," approved June 6, 1933, 48 Stat. 113; U. S. Code, Title 29, Section 49 (c) as amended, hereinafter referred to as the "Wagner-Peyser Act."

(b)  The division shall consult with the directors of economic service areas when determining the location of public employment offices.

(c) The division may locate a public employment office in connection with or as an integrated part of an employment center established under Section 35A-2-203.

(2) (a)  The provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, 29 U.S.C. 49-49c, 49g, 49h, 49k, and 557, are accepted by this state.

(b)  The department is designated and constitutes the agency of this state for the purposes of the act.

(3) (a)  For the purpose of establishing and maintaining free public employment offices, and promoting the use of their facilities, the division may enter into agreements with the railroad retirement board, or any other agency of the United States, or of this or any other state, charged with the administration of any law whose purposes are reasonably related to the purposes of this chapter.

(b)  As a part of an agreement entered into under Subsection (3)(a), the division may accept money, services, or quarters as a contribution to the maintenance of the state system of public employment offices or as reimbursement for services performed.

